Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-738
Effect of registration for enforcement.

(a) A support order or income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order is registered when the order is filed in the registering tribunal of this state.

(b) A registered support order issued in another state or a foreign country is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but shall not modify, a registered support order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 38;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 77;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 36.